Connecticut, session 2026, HB05574.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 1 of special act 25-19 is amended to read as follows
(Effective from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, and except
as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Commissioner of
Administrative Services, on behalf of the Commissioner of Children and
Families, shall convey to the town of Hamden a parcel of land located
in the town of Hamden, and any improvements on said parcel, for the
sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars, plus the
administrative costs of making such conveyance. Said parcel of land has
an area of approximately 50.29 acres and contains the facility formerly
known as High Meadows, located at 825 Hartford Turnpike in the town
of Hamden, and is described in a warranty deed dated January 15, 1951,
and recorded in Volume 297 at pages 417 and 418 of the town of
Hamden Land Records. The conveyance shall be subject to the approval
of the State Properties Review Board.
(b) If the Commissioner of Administrative Services does not convey
said parcel of land and improvements by June 30, [2026] 2027, the parcel

House Bill No. 5574
and improvements shall not be conveyed under this section, except the
town of Hamden may request, and the commissioner may agree, to
extend said deadline for not more than an additional six months. If such
extension is granted, the town of Hamden shall reimburse the state for
its actual costs that are attributable to such extension.
(c) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review of the
conveyance of said parcel of land and improvements not later than
thirty days after it receives a proposed agreement from the Department
of Administrative Services. The land and improvements shall remain
under the care and control of the state until a conveyance is made in
accordance with the provisions of this section. The State Treasurer shall
execute and deliver any deed or instrument necessary for a conveyance
under this section. The Commissioner of Administrative Services shall
have the sole responsibility for all other incidents of such conveyance.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-16 2 of 2